Hawaii statutes.
[§658A-19] Award. (a) An arbitrator
shall make a record of an award. The record shall be signed or otherwise
authenticated by any arbitrator who concurs with the award. The arbitrator or
the arbitration organization shall give notice of the award, including a copy
of the award, to each party to the arbitration proceeding.

(b) An award shall be made within the time
specified by the agreement to arbitrate or, if not specified therein, within
the time ordered by the court. The court may extend or the parties to the
arbitration proceeding may agree in a record to extend the time. The court or
the parties may do so within or after the time specified or ordered. A party
waives any objection that an award was not timely made unless the party gives
notice of the objection to the arbitrator before receiving notice of the award.
[L 2001, c 265, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next